District of Columbia statutes.
42-1216

Office closed on Saturdays.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any other act, the Office of the Recorder of Deeds for the District of Columbia shall be closed on every Saturday.

Aug. 2, 1946, 60 Stat. 860, ch. 758, § 1

History

1981 Ed., § 45-913.
1973 Ed., § 45-712.

Prior Codifications